District of Columbia statutes.
16-3523

Refusal of United States attorney or Attorney General of the District of Columbia to act; procedures.

If the United States attorney or Corporation Counsel refuses to institute a quo warranto proceeding on the request of a person interested, the interested person may apply to the court by certified petition for leave to have the writ issued. When, in the opinion of the court, the reasons set forth in the petition are sufficient in law, the writ shall be allowed to be issued by any attorney, in the name of the District of Columbia, on the relation of the interested person, on his compliance with the conditions prescribed by section 16-3522 as to security for costs.

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 563, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 145(n)
1981 Ed., § 16-3523.
1973 Ed., § 16-3523.